Nebraska, session 109, LB1103.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1103 LB1103
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 81-2025, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-2025 (1) Every officer who has been in the employ of the state as
such and who becomes disabled and physically unfit to perform the duties
of an officer shall be entitled to retire and receive an annuity as
provided by law.
(2) Every officer who has been in the employ of the state as such
for ten years or more, as calculated in section 81-2033, and has attained
the age of fifty years or more shall be entitled to retire and receive an
annuity as provided by law. The right to retire at the age of fifty years
shall be at the option of the officer but such retirement shall be
mandatory upon the officer attaining the age of sixty-five sixty years.
(3) Any officer who has attained the age of sixty-five sixty years
upon his or her separation from state service but who has not been in the
employ of the state for ten years as such shall be entitled to the
annuity as provided for in the Nebraska State Patrol Retirement Act.
(4) Every officer who has been in the employ of the state as such
for twenty-five years or more, as calculated in section 81-2033, and has
attained the age of fifty years shall be entitled to retire and receive
an annuity as provided by law. The right to retire at the age of fifty
years with twenty-five years or more of creditable service shall be at
the option of the officer but such retirement shall be mandatory upon the
officer attaining the age of sixty-five sixty years.
(5) Every officer who has been in the employ of the state as such
for thirty years or more, as calculated in section 81-2033, shall be
entitled to retire and receive an annuity as provided by law. The right
to retire with thirty years or more of creditable service shall be at the
option of the officer but such retirement shall be mandatory upon the
officer attaining the age of sixty-five sixty years.
(6) Payment of any benefit provided under the act shall not be
deferred later than the required beginning date.
-2-

LB1103 LB1103
2026 2026
(7) The effective date of retirement payments shall be the first day
of the month following (a) the date a member qualifies for retirement as
provided in this section or (b) the date upon which a member's request
for retirement is received on an application form provided by the system,
whichever is later. An application may be filed no more than one hundred
twenty days in advance of qualifying for retirement.
(8) The board shall make reasonable efforts to locate the officer or
the officer's beneficiary and distribute benefits by the required
beginning date. If the board is unable to make such a distribution, the
account shall be distributed pursuant to the Uniform Disposition of
Unclaimed Property Act and no amounts may be applied to increase the
benefits any officer would otherwise receive under the Nebraska State
Patrol Retirement Act.
Sec. 2. Section 81-2041, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-2041 (1) Any officer who became a member prior to July 1, 2016,
and who meets the participation requirements of subsection (2) of this
section may participate in DROP. DROP provides that subsequent to
attaining normal age and service retirement eligibility, a member may
voluntarily choose to participate in DROP upon its adoption which, for
purposes of this section, shall be the earlier of September 1, 2008, or
the first of the month following a favorable letter determination by the
Internal Revenue Service. If the member chooses to participate in DROP,
the member shall be deemed to have retired but shall not be deemed to be
terminated, and the member may continue in active employment for up to a
five-year period. During the DROP period, the member's retirement benefit
payments shall be deposited into the DROP account for the benefit of the
member until the member actually retires from active employment at or
before the expiration of the DROP period. Thereafter, future retirement
benefit payments shall be made directly to the member, and the member
shall have access to all funds in the DROP account designated for the
-3-

LB1103 LB1103
2026 2026
benefit of the member. DROP funds shall be held and invested in a defined
contribution account under section 414(k) of the Internal Revenue Code
and shall meet the limitations in section 415 of the code.
(2) To participate in the DROP program, a member shall meet the
following requirements:
(a) A member shall be eligible to enter DROP at any time subsequent
to the date when the member has (i) attained normal retirement age and
(ii) completed twenty-five years of service. Members having attained
normal retirement age and completed twenty-five years of service on or
before the date of adoption of DROP shall be eligible to enter DROP at
any future date;
(b) A member who elects to enter DROP shall be entitled to receive
regular age and service retirement benefits in accordance with section
81-2026. A member is entitled to remain in DROP for a maximum of five
years subsequent to the date of the member's DROP election. A member may
separate from service and thereby exit DROP at any time during the DROP
period. On or before the completion of the DROP period, the member must
separate from active employment and exit DROP. During the DROP period, a
member's retirement benefit shall be payable to the DROP account vendor
designated in the member's name. Amounts transferred or paid to a
participating member's DROP account shall not constitute annual additions
under section 415 of the Internal Revenue Code;
(c) A member electing to enter DROP shall choose an annuity payment
option. After the option is chosen, the member shall not be entitled to
any retirement benefit changes, for reasons including, but not limited
to, wage increases, promotions, and demotions, except that the
restriction on retirement benefit changes shall not apply in the event of
duty-related death or duty-related disability. The benefit amount shall
be fixed as of the date of election and shall be payable as if the
employee retired on that date and separated from active employment. Upon
the death of a member during the DROP period, monthly benefits shall be
-4-

LB1103 LB1103
2026 2026
provided as a percentage of the amount of the member's annuity as set
forth in subsection (3) of section 81-2026 based upon the annuity benefit
calculation made at commencement of the DROP period. In addition, the
balance of the DROP account, if any, shall be provided to the beneficiary
or beneficiaries of the member in accordance with subsection (6) of
section 81-2026 or, if no beneficiary is provided, to the estate of the
member. Upon the disability of a member during the DROP period, the
member shall be deemed to have completed the DROP period, shall begin
receiving the annuity benefit as calculated at the commencement of the
DROP period, and shall be paid the balance of the DROP account, if any;
(d) No member shall be allowed to continue making the required
contributions while the member is enrolled in DROP;
(e) During the DROP period, the Nebraska State Patrol shall not be
assessed the amount required under subsection (2) of section 81-2017 nor
shall such amount be credited to the State Patrol Retirement Fund;
(f) The member shall be paid the balance of the DROP account upon
the member's separation from active employment or at the expiration of
the DROP period thereby ending the member's participation in DROP. If a
member has not voluntarily separated from active employment on or before
the completion of the DROP period, the member's retirement benefit shall
be paid directly to the member thereby ending the member's active
employment. The member's DROP account shall consist of accrued retirement
benefits and interest on such benefits;
(g) Any member that is enrolled in DROP shall be responsible for
directing the DROP account designated for the benefit of the member by
investing the account in any DROP investment options. There shall be no
guaranteed rate of investment return on DROP account assets. Any losses,
charges, or expenses incurred by the participating DROP member in such
member's DROP account by virtue of the investment options selected by the
participating DROP member shall not be made up by the retirement system
but all of the same shall be borne by the participating DROP member. The
-5-

LB1103 LB1103
2026 2026
retirement system, the state, the board, and the state investment officer
shall not be responsible for any investment results under the DROP
agreement. Transfers between investment options shall be in accordance
with the rules and regulations of DROP. A DROP account shall be
established for each participating DROP member. Such DROP account shall
be adjusted no less frequently than annually for the member's retirement
benefit distributions and net investment earnings and losses;
(h) If the DROP account is subject to administrative or other fees
or charges, such fees or charges shall be charged to the participating
DROP member's DROP account; and
(i) Cost-of-living adjustments or payments as provided for in
section 81-2027.08 or 81-2027.09 and 81-2027.10 shall not be applied to
retirement benefits during the DROP period. ; and
(j) Any officer who became a member on or after July 1, 2016, is
specifically prohibited from participating in DROP.
Sec. 3. Original sections 81-2025 and 81-2041, Reissue Revised
Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
-6-